Maine, session 132, LD1394.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1801, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Electric vehicle. "Electric vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is a battery
electric vehicle, as defined in Title 35-A, section 10126, subsection 1, paragraph A, or a
plug-in hybrid electric vehicle, as defined in Title 35-A, section 10126, subsection 1,
paragraph D.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1801, sub-§2-B is enacted to read:
2-B. Manufacturer. "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the business of
manufacturing or assembling new motor vehicles that are sold in this State.
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §1801, sub-§6, as enacted by IB 2023, c. 3, §2, is amended to
read:
6. Telematics system. "Telematics system" means a system in a motor vehicle that
collects information generated by the operation of the vehicle and transmits that
information using wireless communications to a remote receiving point where the
information is stored or used. "Telematics system" includes, but is not limited to, any of
the following services:
A. Automatic airbag deployment and crash notification;
B. Remote diagnostics;
C. Navigation;
D. Vehicle location;
E. Remote door unlock;
F. Transmitting emergency and vehicle location information to public safety
answering points; and
G. Any other service integrating vehicle location technology, wireless
communications or convenience features in a vehicle.
Sec. 4. 29-A MRSA §1810, sub-§7, as enacted by IB 2023, c. 3, §3, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
7. Exclusions. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the
following exclusions from the requirements of this section apply.
A. A manufacturer of motor vehicles sold in the United States may exclude diagnostic,
service and repair information necessary to reset an immobilizer system or security-
related electronic module from information provided to motor vehicle owners and
independent repair facilities. If excluded under this paragraph, the information
necessary to reset an immobilizer system or security-related electronic module must be
made available to motor vehicle owners and independent repair facilities through the
secure data release model system as used on January 5, 2024 by the National
Automotive Service Task Force or other known, reliable and accepted systems.
B. A manufacturer of motor vehicles sold in the United States may be excluded from
the requirements of subsection 6 and any other telematics systems requirements of this
section for any electric vehicle sold by the manufacturer if:
Page 1 - 132LR1706(01)

(1) The electric vehicle's telematics system complies with applicable security and
privacy standards of the Federal Trade Commission and the United States
Department of Transportation, National Highway Traffic Safety Administration as
set forth in rules adopted by the Department of Environmental Protection pursuant
to subsection 7-A; and
(2) The manufacturer meets the electric vehicle availability threshold established
by the Department of Environmental Protection by rule pursuant to subsection 7-A.
To qualify for the exclusion under this paragraph for an electric vehicle, the
manufacturer shall annually provide to the Department of Environmental Protection
for review and approval a certification that it satisfies the requirements of
subparagraphs (1) and (2).
Sec. 5. 29-A MRSA §1810, sub-§7-A is enacted to read:
7-A. Electric vehicle availability threshold; report. In consultation with the
Department of Transportation and the Governor's Energy Office, the Department of
Environmental Protection shall adopt routine technical rules, as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A, for the purposes of administering the exclusion under subsection 7,
paragraph B, which must, at a minimum:
A. Establish an electric vehicle availability threshold that a manufacturer must meet
for the purposes of the exclusion under subsection 7, paragraph B that sets forth a
minimum number of electric vehicles that must be annually delivered for sale or lease
to all motor vehicle dealers in the State by a manufacturer of motor vehicles or a
minimum percentage of electric vehicles out of the total number of all vehicles of that
manufacturer that are delivered for sale or lease to all dealers. In establishing the
threshold, the Department of Environmental Protection shall, at a minimum, account
for the electric vehicle adoption goals outlined in the climate action plan under Title
38, section 577 and motor vehicle and electric vehicle market conditions;
B. Include a process by which the Department of Environmental Protection shall
annually review the electric vehicle availability threshold under paragraph A and adjust
that threshold based on changes in electric vehicle adoption, market conditions or other
factors determined by the department;
C. Identify the applicable security and privacy standards of the Federal Trade
Commission and the United States Department of Transportation, National Highway
Traffic Safety Administration that a manufacturer of motor vehicles must certify that
an electric vehicle complies with for the exclusion under subsection 7, paragraph B to
apply to the electric vehicle; and
D. Include a process by which a manufacturer of motor vehicles may submit to the
Department of Environmental Protection the certification described in paragraph C for
the exclusion under subsection 7, paragraph B to apply to an electric vehicle sold by
the manufacturer.
By January 15, 2026, and annually thereafter, the Department of Environmental Protection
shall submit to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
environment and natural resources matters a report providing, at a minimum, information
regarding the number of manufacturer certifications reviewed and approved or denied
pursuant to subsection 7, paragraph B; an assessment of the effect of those exclusions on
Page 2 - 132LR1706(01)

415 electric vehicle adoption in the State and on consumer safety, data privacy and the
426 availability of diagnostic, service and repair information; and recommendations, including
437 proposed legislation, for amendments to the exclusion in subsection 7, paragraph B or the
448 department's rule-making authority in this subsection. After review, the committee may
459 report out legislation relating to the report.